California statutes. Civil Code
(b) “Age bracket data” means nonpersonally identifiable data derived from a user’s birth date or age for the purpose of sharing with developers of applications that indicates the user’s age range, including, at a minimum, the following:

(1) Whether a user is under 13 years of age.

(2) Whether the user is at least
 13 years of age and under 16 years of age.

(3) Whether the user is at least 16 years of age and under 18 years of age.

(4) Whether the user is at least
 18 years of age.

(c) “Application” means a software application
 that may be run or directed by a user on a computer, a mobile device, or any other general purpose computing device that can access a covered application store or download an application.

(d) “Child” means a natural person who is under 18 years of age.

(e) (1) “Covered application store” means a
 publicly available
 internet website, software application, online service, or platform that distributes and facilitates the download of applications from third-party developers to users of a computer, a mobile device, or any other general purpose computing that can access a covered application store or can download an application.

(2) “Covered application store” does not mean an online service or platform that distributes extensions, plug-ins, add-ons, or other software applications that run exclusively within a separate host application.

(f) “Developer” means a person that owns, maintains, or controls an application.

(g) “Operating system provider” means a person or entity that develops, licenses, or controls the operating system software on a computer, mobile device, or any other general purpose computing device.

(h) “Signal” means age bracket data sent by a real-time secure application programming interface or operating system to an application.

(i) “User” means a child that is the primary user of the device.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 1043)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1798.505.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.501.

(a) An operating system provider shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide an accessible interface at account setup that requires an account holder to indicate the birth date, age, or both, of the user of that device for the purpose of providing a signal regarding the user’s age bracket to applications available in a covered application store.

(2) Provide a developer who has requested a signal with respect to a particular user with a digital signal via a
 reasonably consistent real-time application programming interface that identifies, at a minimum, which of the following categories pertains to the user:

(A) Under 13 years of age.

(B) At least 13 years of age and under
 16 years of age.

(C) At least
 16 years of age and under 18 years of age.

(D) At least 18 years of age.

(3) Send only the minimum amount of information necessary to comply with this title and shall not share the digital signal information with a third party for a purpose not required by this title.

(b) (1) A developer shall request a signal with respect to a particular user from an operating system provider or a covered application store when the application is downloaded
 and launched.

(2) (A) A developer that receives a signal pursuant to this title shall be deemed to have actual knowledge of the
 age range of the user to whom that signal pertains across all platforms of the application and points of access of the application even if the developer willfully disregards the signal.

(B) A developer shall not willfully disregard internal clear and convincing information otherwise available to the developer that indicates that a user’s age is different than the age bracket data indicated by a signal provided by an operating system provider or a covered application store.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a developer shall treat a signal received pursuant to this title as the primary indicator of a user’s age range for purposes of determining the user’s age.

(B) If a developer has internal clear and convincing information that a user’s age is different than the age indicated by a signal received pursuant to this title, the developer shall use that information as the primary indicator of the user’s age.

(4) A developer that receives a signal
 pursuant to this title
 shall use that signal to comply with applicable law but shall not do either of the following:

(A) Request more information from an operating system provider or a covered application store than the minimum amount of information necessary to comply with this title.

(B) Share the signal with a third party for a purpose not required by this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 1043)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1798.505.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.502.

(a) With respect to a device for which account setup was completed before January 1, 2027, an operating system provider shall, before July 1, 2027, provide an accessible interface that allows an account holder to indicate the birth date, age, or both, of the user of that device for the purpose of providing a signal regarding the user’s age bracket to applications available in a covered application store.

(b) If an application last updated with updates on or after January 1, 2026, was downloaded to a device before January 1, 2027, and the developer has not requested a signal with respect to the user of the device on which the application was downloaded, the developer shall request a signal from a covered application store with respect to
 that user before July 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 1043)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1798.505.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.503.

(a) A person that violates this title shall be subject to an injunction and liable for a civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per affected child for each negligent violation or not more than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per affected child for each intentional violation, which shall be assessed and recovered only in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General.

(b) An operating system provider or a covered application store that makes a good faith effort to comply with this title, taking into consideration available technology and any reasonable technical limitations or outages, shall not be liable for an erroneous signal indicating a user’s age range or any conduct by a developer that receives a signal indicating a user’s age range.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 1043)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1798.505.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.504.

(a) This title does not modify, impair, or supersede the operation of any antitrust law.

(b) This title does not require the collection of additional personal information from device owners or device users other than that which is necessary to comply with Section 1798.501.

(c) An
 operating system provider or a covered application store shall comply with this title in a nondiscriminatory
 manner, including, but not limited to, by complying with both of the following:

(1) An operating system provider or a covered application store shall impose at least the same restrictions and obligations on its own applications and application distribution as it does on those from third-party applications or application distributors.

(2) An operating system provider or a covered application store shall not use data collected from a third party in the course of compliance with this title to compete against that third party, give the covered application store’s services preference relative to those of a third party, or to otherwise use this data or consent mechanism in an anticompetitive manner.

(d) The protections provided by this title are in addition to those provided by any other applicable law, including, but not limited to, the California Age-Appropriate Design Code Act (Title 1.81.47 (commencing with Section 1798.99.28)).

(e) If any provision of this title, or application thereof, to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this title that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are declared to be severable.

(f) This title does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A broadband internet access service, as defined in Section 3100.

(2) A telecommunications service, as defined in Section 153 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(3) The delivery or use of a physical product.

(g) This title does not impose liability on an operating system provider, a covered application store, or a developer that arises from the use of a device or application by a person who is not the user to whom a signal pertains.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 1043)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1798.505.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.505.

This title shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 1043)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.82. BUSINESS RECORDS [1799. - 1799.3.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [1799. - 1799.]

1799.

As used in this title:

(a) The term “bookkeeping services” means keeping books, making trial balances, preparing statements, making audits, or preparing reports, all as a part of bookkeeping operations, provided that such trial balances, statements, or reports are not issued over the name of such person as having been prepared or examined by a certified public accountant or public accountant.

(b) The term “business entity” means a
sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association or other group, however organized and whether or not organized to operate at a profit, but does not mean a financial institution organized, chartered, or holding a license or authorization certificate under a law of this state or the United States to make loans or extend credit and subject to supervision by an official or agency of this state or the United States, nor the parent of any such financial institution, nor any subsidiary of any such financial institution or parent.

(c) The term “individual” means a natural person.

(d) The term “person” means any natural person, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, firm, association, or governmental entity.

(e) The term “record” means any item, collection, or grouping of information about an
individual or business entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Disclosures [1799.1. - 1799.1b.]

1799.1.

(a) No business entity which performs bookkeeping services shall disclose in whole or in part the contents of any record, including the disclosure of information in the record in any composite of information, which is prepared or maintained by such business entity to any person, other than the individual or business entity which is the subject of the record, without the express written consent of such individual or business entity.

(b) This section shall not apply to the following:

(1) To a disclosure to any person
pursuant to a subpoena or court order.

(2) To a disclosure which is discoverable.

(3) To a disclosure to any person acting pursuant to a lawful search warrant. 

(4) To a disclosure to a law enforcement agency when required for investigations of criminal activity, unless such disclosure is prohibited by law.

(5) To a disclosure to a taxing agency for purposes of tax administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 221.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.1a.

(a) No person, including an individual, firm, corporation, association, partnership, or joint venture, or any employee or agent thereof, shall disclose information obtained from a federal or state income tax return or any information obtained from a tax schedule submitted with the return by a consumer in connection with a financial or other business-related transaction unless the disclosure is within any of the following:

(1) Consented to in writing by the
consumer in a separate document that states to whom the disclosure will be made and how the information will be used. If the consumer agrees, this separate consent document may be in the form of an electronic record, executed by an electronic signature as provided by Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(2) Authorized or required by state or federal law.

(3) Necessary to complete or service the financial or business-related transaction or to effect, administer, or enforce a financial or business-related transaction requested by the consumer.

(4) Pursuant to court order.

(5) Required to complete any of the transactions described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, by a person, including an individual,
firm, corporation, association, partnership or joint venture, if the disclosure is made solely for that purpose. The provisions of this section apply to any person, including an individual, firm, corporation, association, partnership, or joint venture, and any employee or agent thereof, receiving information as a result of a disclosure authorized by this paragraph.

(A) A proposed or actual sale, merger, transfer, or exchange of all or a portion of a business or operating unit.

(B) A proposed or actual securitization or secondary market sale, including the sale of servicing rights.

(C) To provide information to insurance rate advisory organizations, guaranty funds or agencies, rating agencies, and other persons assessing compliance with industry standards.

(D) To protect against or to prevent actual or potential fraud and unauthorized transactions and claims and for institutional risk control activities.

(b) No unrelated use shall be made of a federal or state tax return or any information obtained therefrom or any information submitted with the return by a consumer in connection with a financial or other business-related transaction. “Unrelated use” means any use that is not necessary to effect, administer, or enforce the financial or other business-related transaction with the consumer or that is beyond the scope of the stated purpose to which the consumer consented for the use of the return or any other information he or she submitted.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(A) “Affiliate”
means any entity that, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, another entity.

(B) “Consumer” means an individual who requests or obtains financial or other business-related services.

(C) “Tax return” means a return, declaration, statement, refund claim, or other document required to be made or to be filed in connection with state or federal income taxes or state bank and corporation franchise taxes.

(2) A disclosure prohibited by this section includes a disclosure made internally within the entity or by that entity to any of its subsidiaries or affiliates.

(3) The information described in subdivision (a) includes that information obtained through an electronic medium.

(d) No person, including an individual, firm, corporation, association, partnership, or joint venture, or any employee or agent thereof, shall dispose of any of the information described in subdivision (a) in a manner in which the identity of the consumer may be determined from the disposed information alone or in combination with other publicly available information. This subdivision shall not become operative if Assembly Bill 2246 of the 1999–2000 Regular Session is enacted and becomes effective on or before January 1, 2001.

(e) The civil remedies in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1799.2) shall be applicable to a violation of this section. Each violation of this section shall constitute a separate cause of action for which damages are recoverable.

(f) The treatment of tax returns by tax preparers, as defined in
Section 22251 of the Business and Professions Code, shall be governed by Section 17530.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1084, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: Subd. (d) is inoperative; AB 2246 was enacted as Ch. 1039, Stats. 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.1b.

(a) Any credit card issuer that receives a change of address request, other than for a correction of a typographical error, from a cardholder who orders a replacement credit card within 60 days before or after that request is received shall send to that cardholder a change of address notification that is addressed to the cardholder at the cardholder’s previous address of record. If the replacement credit card is requested prior to the effective date of the change of address, the notification shall be sent within 30 days of the change
of address request. If the replacement credit card is requested after the effective date of the change of address, the notification shall be sent within 30 days of the request for the replacement credit card.

(b) Any business entity that provides telephone accounts that receives a change of address request, other than for a correction of a typographical error, from an accountholder who orders new service, shall send to that accountholder a change of address notification that is addressed to the accountholder at the accountholder’s previous address of record. The notification shall be sent within 30 days of the request for new service.

(c) The notice required pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) may be given by telephone or e-mail communication if the credit card issuer or business entity that provides telephone accounts reasonably believes that it has the current telephone number or
e-mail address for the accountholder or cardholder who has requested a change of address. If the notification is in writing it may not contain the consumer’s account number, social security number, or other personal identifying information, but may contain the consumer’s name, previous address, and new address of record. For business entities described in subdivision (b), the notification may also contain the accountholder’s telephone number.

(d) A credit card issuer or a business entity that provides telephone accounts is not required to send a change of address notification when a change of address request is made in person by a consumer who has presented valid identification, or is made by telephone and the requester has provided a unique alpha-numeric password.

(e) The following definitions shall apply to this section:

(1) “Credit account” has the same meaning as “credit card,” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1747.02.

(2) “Telephone account” means an account with a telephone corporation, as defined in Section 234 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Civil Remedies [1799.2. - 1799.3.]

1799.2.

(a) A person may initiate a civil action against a business entity in accordance with state law whenever a business entity violates the provisions of Section 1799.1.

(b) In any suit brought pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (a) a business entity which has violated Section 1799.1 shall be liable to the person in an amount equal to the actual damages sustained by the person as a result of such violation, but in no case less than five hundred dollars ($500), and the attendant court costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees.

(c) An action to enforce any liability created under this section may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction within two years from the date on which the cause of action arose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 221.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.3.

(a) No person providing video recording sales or rental services shall disclose any personal information or the contents of any record, including sales or rental information, which is prepared or maintained by that person, to any person, other than the individual who is the subject of the record, without the written consent of that individual.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) To a disclosure to any person pursuant to a subpoena or court order.

(2) To a disclosure that is in response to the proper use of discovery in a pending civil action.

(3) To a disclosure to any person acting pursuant to a lawful search warrant.

(4) To a disclosure to a law enforcement agency when required for investigations of criminal activity, unless that disclosure is prohibited by law.

(5) To a disclosure to a taxing agency for purposes of tax administration.

(6) To a disclosure of names and addresses
only for commercial purposes.

(c) Any willful violation of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, which may be recovered in a civil action brought by the person who is the subject of the records.

(d) (1) Any person who willfully violates this section on three or more occasions in any six-month period shall, in addition, be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, which may be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, by any district attorney or city attorney, or by a city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor, in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) If
the action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the General Fund. If the action is brought by a district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(e) The penalty provided by this section is not an exclusive remedy, and does not affect any other relief or remedy provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 14.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.83. PRECOMPUTED INTEREST [1799.5. - 1799.6.]

1799.5.

(a) “Precomputed interest” means interest, as that term is contemplated by the Truth in Lending Act, 15 United States Code 1605(a)(1), which is (1) computed by multiplying the original balance of the loan by a rate and multiplying that product by the number of payment periods elapsing between the date of the loan and the date of the last scheduled payment and (2) either added to the original principal balance of the loan in advance or subtracted from the loan proceeds.

(b) No loan which is made to
 a natural person primarily for personal, family, or household purposes shall provide for the payment of precomputed interest if the date on which the final installment is due, according to the original terms of the loan, is more than 62 months after the date of the loan.

(c) For purposes of determining whether a loan is covered by this title, the lender may conclusively rely on any written statement of intended purpose signed by the borrower. Such written statement may be a separate statement signed by the borrower or may be contained in a loan application or other document signed by the borrower.

(d) For purposes of this title, the term “loan” does not include the forbearance of a debt arising from a sale or lease of property and does not include any loan arising under an open end credit plan.

(e) This title shall
 apply only to loans made on or after January 1, 1983.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1380, Sec. 2.   Effective October 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.6.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.84. PRECOMPUTED FINANCE CHARGE CONTRACT [1799.8. - 1799.85.]

1799.8.

(a) “Precomputed finance charge” means a finance charge which is (1) computed by multiplying the original contract balance by a rate and multiplying that product by the number of payment periods elapsing between the date of the contract and the date of the last scheduled payment and (2) either added to the original contract balance in advance or subtracted from the contract balance. 

(b) “Contract” means any agreement (1) providing for the construction, sale, or construction and sale of an entire residence, with or without a parcel of real property or an interest therein, or for the sale
 of a lot or parcel of real property, including any site preparation incidental to such sale, and (2) where the purchaser is a natural person who enters into such agreement primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(c) No contract as defined in subdivision (b) shall provide for the payment of a precomputed finance charge if the date on which the final installment is due, according to the original terms of the contract, is more than 62 months after the date of the contract.

(d) For purposes of determining whether a contract is covered by this title, the seller may conclusively rely on any written statement of intended purpose signed by the purchaser. Such written statement may be a separate statement signed by the purchaser or may be contained in a credit application or other document signed by the purchaser.

(e) This title shall apply only to contracts entered into on or after January 1, 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.85.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.85. CONSUMER CREDIT CONTRACTS [1799.90. - 1799.104.]

1799.90.

As used in this title:

(a) “Consumer credit contract” means any of the following obligations to pay money on a deferred payment basis, where the money, property, services or other consideration which is the subject matter of the contract is primarily for personal, family or household purposes:

(1) Retail installment contracts, as defined in Section 1802.6.

(2) Retail
 installment accounts, as defined in Section 1802.7.

(3) Conditional sales contracts, as defined in Section 2981.

(4) Loans or extensions of credit secured by other than real property, or unsecured, for use primarily for personal, family or household purposes.

(5) Loans or extensions of credit for use primarily for personal, family or household purposes where such loans or extensions of credit are subject to the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 10240) of Chapter 3 of Part I of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000), Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000), or Division 10 (commencing with Section 24000) of the Financial Code, whether secured by real property or otherwise.

(6) Lease
 contracts, as defined in Section 2985.7.

(b) “Creditor” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association or other entity, however designated, who enters into or arranges for consumer credit contracts in the ordinary course of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 800, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.91.

(a) Each creditor who obtains the signature of more than one person on a consumer credit contract shall deliver to each person who does not in fact receive any of the money, property, or services which are the subject matter of the consumer credit contract, prior to that person’s becoming obligated on the consumer credit contract, a notice in English and the languages set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1632 in a clear and conspicuous manner in at least 10-point Arial equivalent type as follows:NOTICE TO COSIGNERYou are being asked to guarantee this debt. Think carefully before you do. If the borrower doesn’t pay the debt, you will have to. Be sure you can afford to pay if you have to, and that
 you want to accept this responsibility.

You may have to pay up to the full amount of the debt if the borrower does not pay. You may also have to pay late fees or collection costs, which increase this amount.

The creditor can collect this debt from you without first trying to collect from the borrower. The creditor can use the same collection methods against you that can be used against the borrower, such as suing you, garnishing your wages, etc. If this debt is ever in default, that fact may become a part of your credit record.

This notice is not the contract that makes you liable for the debt.

(b) Whenever notice is required to be given under subdivision (a) or (d) and the consumer credit contract is written in a language other than English or a language set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1632, the
 creditor shall deliver the notice as required in subdivision (a) or (d) in English and in the language in which the consumer contract is written.

(c) The requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to a creditor offering or extending open-end credit, as defined in Regulation Z, to joint applicants if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The application or agreement signed by each applicant clearly and conspicuously discloses that after credit approval each applicant shall have the right to use the open-end credit plan to the extent of any limit set by the creditor and may be liable for all amounts extended under the plan to any joint applicant.

(2) After credit approval, the creditor issues for the use of each applicant any credit device such as a credit card which may be used to obtain credit
 under the open-end credit plan and sends the credit device to the address specified in the application or otherwise delivers the credit device in a manner specified in the application or agreement signed by each applicant.

This paragraph does not apply to a creditor who does not issue a credit card or other credit device in order to obtain credit under the creditor’s open-end credit plan.

(d) A lessor under a lease shall deliver to each person who does not in fact receive the vehicle which is the subject of the lease contract, prior to that person becoming liable on the lease contract, the following notice in English and the languages set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1632 in a clear and conspicuous manner in at least 10-point Arial equivalent type in lieu of the notice required by subdivision (a):NOTICE TO COSIGNERYou are being asked to guarantee this lease. Think carefully before you do. If the lessee doesn’t pay, you will have to. Be sure you can afford to pay if you have to, and that you want to accept this responsibility.

You may have to pay up to the full amount owed on the lease if the lessee does not pay. You may also have to pay late fees or other collection costs, which increase this amount.

The lessor can collect on the lease from you without first trying to collect from the lessee. The lessor can use the same collection methods against you that can be used against the lessee, such as suing you, garnishing your wages, etc. If this lease is ever in default, that fact may become part of your credit record.

This notice is not the contract that makes you liable for the lease obligation.

(e) “Regulation Z” has the meaning set forth in Section 1802.18.

(f) The word “your” in the last sentence of the third paragraph of the notice in English set forth in subdivisions (a) and (d) shall be italicized.

(g) (1) On or before January 1, 2023, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall make available for download on its internet website translations of the notices set forth in subdivisions (a) and (d), which may be used to satisfy the requirements of this section.

(2) If additional languages are added to Section 1632 by subsequent amendment, the department shall make available for download on its internet website translations of the notices set forth in subdivisions (a) and (d) in the new
 language.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   (SB 633)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.92.

(a) The notice required by Section 1799.91 shall be provided on a separate sheet that meets the following requirements:

(1) It shall not contain any other text except as is necessary to identify the creditor and consumer credit contract or lessor and lease to which the statement refers.

(2) It shall provide for the date and the person’s acknowledgment of receipt.

(3) It shall be attached to and precede the consumer credit contract or lease.

(b) The creditor or lessor may develop the separate sheet described in subdivision (a) so
 long as it conforms to the requirements of this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 149, Sec. 2.   (SB 633)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.93.

(a) The creditor shall not obtain the signature of any person entitled to notice under Section 1799.91 if the consumer credit contract contains blank spaces to be filled in after the person’s signature has been obtained.

(b) The creditor shall give each person entitled to notice under Section 1799.91 a copy of the debt instrument and security agreement or deed of trust, if any, evidencing the consumer credit contract and, if separate therefrom, a copy of the notice required by Section 1799.91 and a copy of the document evidencing that person’s
 obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 987, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.94.

The text of the statement required by Section 1799.91 of this title shall not be construed to alter or affect the rights and obligations of the parties to any consumer credit contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 847.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.95.

No action shall be brought, nor shall any security interest be enforced, by any creditor or any assignee of a creditor on any consumer credit contract which fails to comply with this title against any person, however designated, who is entitled to notice under Section 1799.91 and who does not in fact receive any of the money, property or services which are the subject matter of the consumer credit contract.

Nothing herein shall affect the rights of any bona fide purchaser for value of property sold pursuant to the enforcement of a security interest if the purchase was made without notice of any facts
 constituting a violation of this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 987, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.96.

If federal law or regulations require or permit the use of a notice substantially similar to that required by Section 1799.91, the use of such federally sanctioned notice and an accurate translation thereof into the languages set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1632 shall constitute compliance with Section 1799.91. However, the other provisions of this title shall remain unaffected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 149, Sec. 3.   (SB 633)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.97.

(a) No consumer credit contract shall provide for a security interest in any religious books, religious artifacts, or religious materials, valued at less than five hundred dollars ($500), unless the religious books, artifacts, or materials are specifically pledged as collateral.

(b) Any provision in any contract which provides for a security interest in violation of subdivision (a) shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.98.

(a) Nothing in this title shall be construed to make applicable or affect or operate as a waiver of any of the provisions of any of the following:

(1) Title 13 (commencing with Section 2787) of Part 4 of Division 3 of this code.

(2) Parts 1 (commencing with Section 700), 2 (commencing with Section 760), 3 (commencing with Section 900), and 4 (commencing with Section 1100) of Division 4 of the Family
 Code.

(3) Sections 4301 and 4302 of the Family Code.

(b) The delivery of notice pursuant to Section 1799.91 is not evidence that the person to whom the notice was delivered entered or did not enter the transaction in the capacity of a surety.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 10) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 28.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.99.

(a) This section applies to transactions, other than consumer credit contracts as defined in Section 1799.90, which are subject to 16 C.F.R. 444.3, 12 C.F.R. 227.14, or 12 C.F.R. 535.3, whichever is applicable to the creditor. 

(b) Unless the persons who are obligated under the transaction are married to each other, no action shall be brought, nor shall any security interest be enforced, against any person entitled to receive notice under 16 C.F.R. 444.3, 12 C.F. R. 227.14, or 12 C.F.R. 535.3, whichever is applicable to the creditor, if that person did not receive
 the notice in the manner prescribed by the applicable regulation and an accurate Spanish translation of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.100.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to take a security interest in any household goods, as defined in subdivision (g), in connection with a consumer credit contract or other credit obligation incurred primarily for personal, family, or household purposes unless (1) the person takes possession of the household goods or (2) the purchase price of the household goods was financed through the consumer credit contract or credit obligation.

(b) An
 agreement or other document creating a nonpossessory security interest in personal property as defined in subdivision (d) in connection with a consumer credit contract or other credit obligation incurred primarily for personal, family, or household purposes shall contain a statement of description reviewed and signed by the consumer indicating each specific item of the personal property in which the security interest is taken. A consumer credit contract or other credit obligation subject to the Unruh Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1801) of Title 2) that complies with the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 1803.3, or of subdivision (f) of Section 1810.1, shall be deemed to comply with this subdivision.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who has a nonpossessory security interest in personal property, described in subdivision (d), taken in connection with a consumer credit contract or other credit obligation
 incurred primarily for personal, family, or household purposes shall only enforce the security interest by judicial action unless the property is abandoned or freely and voluntarily surrendered by the consumer.
